Idaho, session 2025, S1190.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Public Utilities Commission $11,800 to
be expended for personnel costs from the Public Utilities Commission Fund
for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, for the purpose of commis-
sioner salaries.
SECTION 2. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Industrial Commission $11,800 to be ex-
pended for personnel costs from the Industrial Administration Fund for the
period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, for the purpose of commissioner
salaries.
SECTION 3. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the State Tax Commission in the General Ser-
vices Program, the following amounts to be expended for personnel costs from
the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, for the
purpose of commissioner salaries:
FROM:
General
Fund $13,000
Multistate Tax Compact
Fund 1,100
Administration Services for Transportation
Fund 1,600
TOTAL $15,700
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.